Massachusetts, session 194th, HD1248.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, the Norfolk County Retirement Board is hereby authorized and directed to credit
Richard Martini with creditable service, for the period of July, nineteen hundred and ninety- five
through June, two thousand, inclusive for the purpose of determining his superannuation
retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section
five of chapter thirty-two of the General Laws; provided however, that before the date of any
retirement allowance becomes effective in the case of Richard Martini, said Richard Martini
shall pay into the annuity savings fund of said retirement system of said city in one sum or
installments, upon such terms and conditions as said board may prescribe, an annual amount
equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service, plus interest.
of 1